Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1122
Dental locum tenens; issuance; requirements; term.

When circumstances indicate a need for the issuance of a dental locum tenens in the State of Nebraska, the department, with the recommendation of the board, may issue a dental locum tenens to an individual who holds an active license to practice dentistry in another state if the requirements regarding education and examination for licensure in that state are equal to or exceed the requirements regarding education and examination for licensure in Nebraska. A dental locum tenens may be issued for a period not to exceed ninety days in any twelve-month period.

Laws 2007, LB463, § 455.